Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2807.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The title of chapter 113 of title 16 entitled "Rhode Island Hope Scholarship
Pilot Program Act" is hereby amended to read as follows: "Rhode Island Hope Scholarship Program
Act".
SECTION 2. Sections 16-113-7 and 16-113-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-113
entitled "Rhode Island Hope Scholarship Pilot Program Act" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
16-113-7. Reporting and disbursement.
(a) On or before November 10, 2023, and on or before November 10 and May 10 thereafter
for every year through and including calendar year 2030 thereafter, Rhode Island college shall
submit a report to the director of the office of management and budget, the state budget officer, the
house fiscal advisor, the senate fiscal advisor, the commissioner of postsecondary education, and
the chair of the council on postsecondary education, detailing the following:
(1) The number of students eligible to participate in the scholarship program;
(2) The amount of federal and institutional financial aid anticipated to be received by
recipient students;
(3) The aggregate tuition and mandatory fee costs attributable to recipient students;
(4) The resulting total cost of the scholarship program to the state; and
(5) The report shall contain such data for both the current fiscal year and the most up-to-

date forecast for the following fiscal year. Data reported shall be subdivided by student-year cohort
and shall be accompanied by a written explanation detailing the estimating methodology utilized
and any impact(s) the forecasted data may present to institutional capacity, operational costs, and
the tuition/fee revenue base of the institution.
(b) On or before July 1, 2030, Rhode Island college and the commissioner of postsecondary
education shall submit a report evaluating the program based on all cohorts to the governor, speaker
of the house, and the president of the senate. This evaluation shall include the following:
(1) The number of students who started in each cohort;
(2) The number of students in each cohort who have attained a degree or certification in an
on-time manner;
(3) The number of students in each cohort who have not attained a degree or certification
in an on-time manner and an analysis of why that has happened;
(4) The number of students in each cohort who began the program but have been unable to
continue or complete the program and an analysis of why that has happened;
(5) The costs of the program and the costs of continuing the program;
(6) Suggestions for ways to increase the success of the program;
(7) Recommendations as to modifying, continuing, expanding, curtailing, or discontinuing
the program; provided that, on and after July 1, 2026, the program shall be deemed a continuing
scholarship program; and
(8) Any such other recommendations or information as Rhode Island college and the
commissioner of postsecondary education deem appropriate to include in the evaluation.
(c) The office of management and budget, in consultation with the office of the
postsecondary commissioner, shall oversee the apportionment and disbursement of all funds
appropriated for the purpose of the scholarship program.
(d) Effective July 1, 2026, the "Rhode Island hope scholarship program" and all references
to the "Rhode Island hope scholarship pilot program" shall be construed to mean and refer to the
"Rhode Island hope scholarship program."
16-113-10. Funding of and sunset of pilot program Funding of Rhode Island hope
scholarship program.
The Rhode Island hope scholarship pilot program shall be funded from July 1, 2023,
through and including June 30, 2030 and every year thereafter. There shall be no further funding
of the pilot program without further action of the general assembly. Any final reports due pursuant
to this chapter shall be filed pursuant to the dates set forth herein.
LC004458 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC004458
========
LC004458 - Page 3 of 4